Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-427
Partner not co-owner of partnership property.

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest in partnership property which can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 27.